Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-103.26
Nonprofit corporation, defined.

Nonprofit corporation
means any corporation organized under the laws of this state, not for profit,
which has been exempted from the payment of federal income taxes.

Laws 2010, LB861, § 34.